California statutes. Public Resources Code
(c) Costs against the state shall not be allowed in the suit.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 296, Sec. 261.   (AB 1023)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

7556.

All swamp and overflowed lands within one mile of the State Prison at San Quentin, within the City and County of San Francisco, City of Oakland, or within five miles of the corporate limits of either, are excluded from the operation of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 609.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Sale of Inland Lake and Unsegregated Swamp and Overflowed Lands [7601. - 7609.]

7601.

Any person desiring to purchase any of the lands uncovered by the recession or drainage of the waters of inland lakes, and inuring to the State by virtue of her sovereignty, or the swamp and overflowed lands not segregated by the United States, shall make an application therefor to the commission. The application shall be accompanied by the applicant’s affidavit that he is a citizen of the United States, or has declared his intention to become such, that he is a resident of this State, of lawful age, that he desires to purchase such lands (describing them by legal subdivisions, or by metes and bounds, if the legal subdivisions are unknown), under the provisions of this chapter, for his own use and benefit, and for the use and benefit of no other person whomsoever, and that he has made no contract or agreement to sell the lands, and that he does not now own any State lands which, together with that now sought to be purchased, exceeds 640 acres.

This section shall not affect or apply to any land uncovered by the recession or drainage of the waters of any lake or other body of water, the waters of which are so impregnated with minerals as to be valuable for the purpose of extracting therefrom such minerals.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 609.)
-------------------------------------------

7602.

Upon the filing of such application, if the land has not been sectionized, the commission shall authorize the county surveyor of the county where the whole or the greater portion of the land lies, to survey the land. He shall make an actual survey thereof, at the expense of the applicant, etablishing four corners to each quarter-section, and connecting the survey with a United States survey. Within 30 days he shall file with the commission a copy, under oath, of his field-notes and plat, and a statement under oath, showing whether or not the land is occupied by any actual settler. If the surveyor thus authorized fails to make his return to the commission within the time specified, the commission may designate another person to make the survey.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 609.)
-------------------------------------------

7603.

No application to purchase land under this chapter shall be approved until the expiration of 90 days from the filing thereof, and meanwhile the land is subject to the adverse claim of any actual settler who resided thereon when the application was filed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 609.)
-------------------------------------------

7604.

The lands designated in this chapter shall be sold at the price fixed by the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 981.)
-------------------------------------------

7605.

If any of the lands described in this chapter are suitable for cultivation without reclamation, they shall be sold only to actual settlers in tracts not exceeding 160 acres.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 609.)
-------------------------------------------

7606.

Any of the lands designated in this chapter which, by reason of periodical overflow, need, and are susceptible of, reclamation, may be reclaimed by the formation of districts, in the same manner and subject to all of the provisions of law regulating the reclamation of swamp and overflowed lands. The board of supervisors of the county in which the lands, or the greater part thereof, are situated, shall first determine, upon proper petition presented therefor by the holders of the title, or evidence of title, representing one-half or more of any body of such land, that such reclamation is necessary and feasible.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 609.)
-------------------------------------------

7607.

When land has been sold under this chapter, no contest can be maintained against the purchaser on the ground that the land is not of the character stated in the application, unless it is shown that it is not of the character recited in Section 7601.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 609.)
-------------------------------------------

7608.

All uncanceled certificates of purchase and patents issued prior to May 20, 1907, and payments made prior to May 20, 1907, for any lands as swamp and overflowed lands, which belong to any of the classes described in Section 7601, whether or not such lands were segregated or sectionized, are for all purposes valid, and have the same force and effect as if such lands had been at all times subject to sale as swamp and overflowed lands.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 609.)
-------------------------------------------

7609.

All plats of any of the lands described in Section 7601, which were made prior to May 20, 1907, under authority of the United States Surveyor General, and which plats designate the lands as swamp and overflowed land, shall be deemed valid and effectual as surveys of such lands from and after the date thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 609.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Provisions Relating to Public Lands Generally [7705. - 8030.]



  ARTICLE 1. Applications for Purchase of Lands [7705. - 7706.]

7705.

No application for the purchase of state lands shall be accepted for filing for land situated in more than one county, or land situated in more than one United States land district or for any section or portion of a section of school land or land obtained in lieu thereof belonging to the State which is situated within the exterior boundaries of a military or Indian reservation created by authority of the United States, except as otherwise specifically permitted by Chapter 1 (commencing at Section 7301) of this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 241.)
-------------------------------------------

7706.

Each application for lands shall be accompanied by a reasonable filing fee, not in excess of one hundred dollars ($100), as prescribed by the commission by rule or regulation, and no application shall be filed, or noted in any way until the fee is paid.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1205.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Payments, Certificates of Purchase, and Patents [7723. - 7733.]

7723.

Certificates of purchase, and all rights acquired thereunder, are subject to sale, by deed or assignment, executed and acknowledged before any officer authorized by law to take acknowledgments of conveyances of real property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 609.)
-------------------------------------------

7724.

All such sales shall, when the deed or assignment is recorded by the county recorder, be reported by him to the commission, to be entered in its books.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 609.)
-------------------------------------------

7725.

The recorder is entitled to receive from the purchaser, for making such report, a fee of fifty cents ($0.50).

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 609.)
-------------------------------------------

7729.

Whenever a person becomes entitled to a patent, the commission, upon the surrender of the full-paid certificate of purchase or the submission of an affidavit by a person having an interest in the land or any portion thereof that the certificate of purchase is lost, destroyed or beyond the control of the owner or owners of the land, shall prepare a patent for the land. The patent shall be issued in the name of the original applicant. The commission shall send it to the Governor, together with a certificate that the laws in relation thereto have been complied with, that payment in full has been made, and that the person named in the prepared patent is entitled to it. The patent so issued shall inure to the benefit of the assigns, grantees, or successors in interest of said original applicant. The United States shall not be required to make payment for state land until the patent is delivered.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1959, Ch. 243.)
-------------------------------------------

7730.

The patent or deed shall then be signed by the Governor, attested by the Secretary of State, sealed with the Great Seal of the State of California, and countersigned by the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 742, Sec. 13.   (SB 1493)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

7731.

No patent shall issue until the lands are relinquished to the State by authority of the General Land Office at Washington. Such relinquishment is not required for locations of the sixteenth and thirty-sixth sections in place, or for swamp and overflowed lands, shown to be such by the official surveys made by authority of the United States.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 609.)
-------------------------------------------

7732.

The commission shall record all patents in books to be kept in its office for that purpose, and then deliver them to persons entitled thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 609.)
-------------------------------------------

7733.

Where a patent for lands is issued in the name of a deceased person, the title is vested in the heirs, devisees, or assignees of such person in the same manner as if the patent had issued to such person during life.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 609.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Contests [7921. - 7927.]

7921.

When a contest arises before the commission concerning the approval of a survey or location, or concerning a certificate of purchase or other evidence of title, the commission may, when the question involved is as to the survey, or one purely of fact, or whether the land applied for is a part of the swamp or overflowed lands of the State, or whether it is included within a confirmed grant, the lines of which have been run by authority of law, proceed to hear and determine the contest. When, in the judgment of the commission, a question of law is involved, or when either party demands a trial in the courts of the State, the commission shall make an order referring the contest to the superior court of the county in which the land is situated, and shall enter the order in a record book in its office.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 609.)
-------------------------------------------

7922.

After such order is made, either party may bring an action in the superior court of the county in which the land in question is situated, to determine the conflict, and the production of a certified copy of the entry made by the commission gives the court full and complete jurisdiction to hear and determine the action.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 609.)
-------------------------------------------

7923.

Any person, legally qualified to purchase from the State public lands of the same character as the land involved in the action, may, after such order of reference has been made, present to the commission his application, in due form as required by law, to purchase the land, or any part thereof not less than the smallest legal subdivision. Upon presenting to the court in which the action is pending, a certificate of the commission, showing that such application has been so presented, and a certified copy of such application, the court may, at any time before the trial, upon such terms as may be just, allow such party to intervene in the action and contest the right of any other party thereto to purchase the land applied for by the intervenor, and to have his own right determined.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 609.)
-------------------------------------------

7924.

When any contest arises as provided for in this article there shall be filed with the commission a statement by the contestant of the grounds of contest, and such statement, other than as to matters of record or law, shall be corroborated by the affidavit of some competent person having personal knowledge of the facts set forth therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 609.)
-------------------------------------------

7925.

When a copy of the final judgment of the court is filed with the commission, it shall approve the survey or location, or issue the certificate of purchase or other evidence of title in accordance with the judgment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 609.)
-------------------------------------------

7926.

Unless the party contestant commences his action within 60 days after the order of reference is made, his rights in the premises and under his application cease.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 609.)
-------------------------------------------

7927.

Whenever the commission receives a plat of a survey pursuant to the provisions of Section 27564 of the Government Code, any action by the commission to contest such survey shall be commenced within 90 days from the date of receipt of the plat of the survey.

(History: Added by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1121.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Correction of Incorrect Descriptions of Patented Lands [7951. - 7958.]

7951.

When payment has been made in full for any lands which were public lands of the State and a patent has been issued therefor, and the purchaser or his successor in interest has, for a period of five years, been in possession, claiming under such patent the lands intended to be described therein and thereby, but which lands are incorrectly described in the patent, the person so in possession of the lands may have a new and correct survey made of the lands covered by the patent. The plat or map and field-notes constituting the survey shall be made and certified by the county surveyor of the county in which the land is located or by any other surveyor licensed by the State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 609.)
-------------------------------------------

7952.

After the map or plat and field-notes constituting the survey have been made, the field-notes and the map or plat shall be submitted to the commission for approval. If approved by it, the commission shall so certify and a copy of the map or plat and field-notes shall be filed in the office of the commission and a copy recorded in the office of the county recorder of the county in which the land is situated. Such map or plat shall thereafter be the official map or plat of the land so surveyed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 609.)
-------------------------------------------

7953.

After the filing and recording of the map or plat and field-notes, the purchaser or his successors in interest holding lands under such patent may file a verified petition in the superior court of the county in which all or the greater part of the property is located for the correction of the errors in the description. He shall set forth a copy of the patent in the petition, together with a statement showing a correct description of the lands intended to be described therein as is shown upon the plat or map and field-notes, and shall pray that a decree be entered by the court confirming the descriptions as so amended.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 609.)
-------------------------------------------

7954.

Upon the filing of the petition, the court shall set a day for the hearing thereof not less than 20 days from the date of the filing of the petition. A copy of the petition and of the order fixing time of hearing shall be served upon all owners of lands which are or may be affected by the decree of confirmation at least 10 days before the hearing and such owners may appear upon the day fixed and oppose the petition.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 609.)
-------------------------------------------

7955.

If, after the hearing, the court is satisfied that the descriptions as corrected are the true descriptions, it shall render a decree confirming the descriptions, which thereafter shall have the same effect as if the patent described the land in accordance with the corrected descriptions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 609.)
-------------------------------------------

7956.

The cost of making the survey, map or plat and field-notes and all other necessary costs incurred in a suit brought under this article shall be apportioned among the petitioners and owners of lands affected by the decree in such proportions as the court may deem equitable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 609.)
-------------------------------------------

7957.

Certified copies of the decree entered in the suit shall be filed in the office of the county recorder and in the office of the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 609.)
-------------------------------------------

7958.

Any number of land owners whose lands are contiguous or would be affected by the decree may unite in one petition under this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 609.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Procedure on Improper Sales and Abandonment of Entries [7971. - 7977.]

7971.

If any land was not the property of the State, at the date application was filed therefor, or if the land applied for was swamp and overflowed land but the application became or was void by reason of the fact that the land had not been segregated, or if subsequent to March 20, 1889, any money has been accepted by the State as a part of or on account of the purchase price of any State land under an application or certificate of purchase which at the time of accepting such money had become invalidated by reason of an act of the Legislature of the State of California entitled “An act respecting the payment in full by holders of certificates of purchase for lands sold by the State of California prior to March 27, 1872, and for which the said State has at any time heretofore issued certificates of purchase to subsequent purchasers,” approved March 20, 1889, the owner of such certificate of purchase or patent may receive in exchange therefor, from the commission, a certificate showing the amount paid and the class of land upon which payment was made by conveying a quitclaim deed to the State, all of his right, title and interest in and to the land. If the land is lieu land or indemnity land, the commission’s certificate shall not issue until the selection therefor is canceled by authority of the Department of the Interior.

(History: Added by Stats. 1945, Ch. 1067.)
-------------------------------------------

7972.

In all cases where money has been paid since the passage of the act of March 20, 1889, on account of the purchase price of lands where the certificates or applications, became invalidated by reason of that act, the amount to be repaid as shown in the certificate to be issued by the commission in exchange for the certificate of purchase, shall be only such amount as has been paid on account of the purchase price of such lands subsequent to the passage of the act of March 20, 1889.

(History: Added by Stats. 1945, Ch. 1067.)
-------------------------------------------

7973.

The authority of the commission to issue such certificate and likewise the authority of the auditor and Controller to issue their warrants, as provided in Section 7974, shall not be barred by any period of time which may have elapsed since the issuance of the certificate of purchase or patent, but in the issuance of the certificate, the commission shall first determine that the person applying for the certificate is the owner of the certificate of purchase or patent, and has not assigned or conveyed his interest therein or in the land therein described or any part thereof, and that it is a proper case for the issuance of a certificate. A copy of a patent duly certified by the county recorder of any county where it has been recorded shall have the same force and effect as the original.

(History: Added by Stats. 1945, Ch. 1067.)
-------------------------------------------

7974.

If the land sold was swamp and overflowed, the county auditor of the county in which the land is situated shall, upon the surrender to him of the certificate mentioned in Section 7971, draw his warrant in favor of the person surrendering the certificate for the amount therein specified, upon the treasurer of the county, who shall pay the warrant out of the swamp and overflowed land fund of the district in which the land is situated. If the land sold was not swamp and overflowed, the Controller of the State, upon the surrender to him of the certificate, shall draw his warrant in favor of the person surrendering the certificate, for the amount therein specified, upon the Treasurer of the State, who shall pay the warrant out of the fund into which the purchase-money was paid.

(History: Added by Stats. 1945, Ch. 1067.)
-------------------------------------------

7975.

Whenever a purchaser of land upon credit desires to abandon the location or entry made by him, he may do so by conveyance of his title to the State and surrender of the certificate of purchase, or, if it has been lost, by filing an affidavit of that fact with the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 609.)
-------------------------------------------

7976.

Whenever any person has, in conformity with law, conveyed any land to the State by quitclaim deed, duly executed, delivered, and accepted by the commission, for the purpose of receiving restitution of the purchase price thereof, as provided by law, and such restitution has not been made, and a patent for such land is thereafter issued in the name of the original purchaser, the title granted by such patent shall vest in, and inure to the benefit of, such original purchaser, his heirs, assigns, and successors in interest, notwithstanding the execution, delivery and acceptance of the quitclaim deed, as fully and completely as if the quitclaim deed had never been made, executed, delivered, or accepted.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 609.)
-------------------------------------------

7977.

Upon the issuance of such patent, the commission shall make and issue to the patentee therein named, his heirs, assigns, and successors in interest, a certificate under the seal of the commission, reciting the making, execution, delivery and acceptance of the quitclaim deed, and further reciting the fact that no restitution of the purchase price of the land was made. Upon the presentation of such certificate to the county recorder of the county wherein such land is situate, the recorder shall record it in the proper book in the records of such county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 609.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Miscellaneous Provisions Relating to State Lands [7991. - 7993.]

7991.

The shore and the bed of the ocean or of any navigable channel or stream or bay or inlet within the State, between ordinary high and low water mark, over which the ordinary tide ebbs and flows is hereby withheld from sale.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 609.)
-------------------------------------------

7992.

If any person, under any pretense of any claim inconsistent with the sovereignty and jurisdiction of the State, intrudes upon any of the waste or ungranted lands of the State, the district attorney of the county shall immediately report the intrusion to the Governor, who shall thereupon, by a written order, direct the sheriff of the county to remove the intruder. If resistance to the execution of the order is made or threatened, the sheriff may call to his aid the power of the county, as in cases of resistance to the writs of the people.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 609.)
-------------------------------------------

7993.

When State lands, upon which the full purchase price has not been paid, have been sold to the State for delinquent taxes and the deed therefor to the State has been forwarded to and filed with the commission, such lands shall again become subject to entry and sale in the same manner, and subject to the same conditions, as apply to State lands of like character.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 609.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. State Maps and Surveys [8001. - 8025.]

8001.

As used in this article, “department” means the Department of Water Resources.

(History: Added by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

8002.

The state base map shall consist of complementary planimetric, mosaic, and topographic maps prepared in units of convenient size and scale.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 1581.)
-------------------------------------------

8003.

The state base maps shall have delineated thereon plane rectangular coordinates which shall conform to the provisions of Division 8 (commencing at Section 8801) of this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

8011.

The department shall investigate mapping; shall prepare a complete report thereon including plans and recommendations for an adequate mapping program for California; and shall adopt a general plan and program for the accomplishment of the policy declared in this article. The general plan and program so adopted, and as from time to time modified, amended or revised by the department, shall be the authorized general plan and program to be carried out by the state departments. The department may from time to time make such further investigations and reports upon mapping as deemed proper by it in pursuance of the policy declared in this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1961, Ch. 83.)
-------------------------------------------

8012.

The technical methods used in preparation of the state base map, the terms of the contract, the specifications, and acceptance of the base maps or units thereof shall be the responsibility of the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

8013.

The department may enter into cooperative agreements with any department of the State qualified in the making and using of surveys and maps for the performance of such duties, reasonably connected with the functions of the department, as may aid in the accomplishment of the objectives prescribed in this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

8014.

The department may enter into contracts with public and private agencies for mapping and surveys not now the direct responsibility of existing state agencies with the approval of the Director of General Services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 371.)
-------------------------------------------

8014.5.

With the approval of the Director of General Services the department may enter into cooperative agreements with the federal government or any agency or agencies thereof for performance of map production work in accordance with the general plan and program adopted hereunder.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 371.)
-------------------------------------------

8015.

The department is authorized to accept grants from the Federal Government or any of its agencies, or from any county, city and county, or city or other political agencies, and may accept gifts for the purpose of implementing mapping and surveys of this State when the same meet the specifications adopted by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

8016.

To enable the coordination of the programs of the several map-making agencies, the department shall cause data to be assembled covering the various types of maps produced or being produced by federal, state or other agencies, their uses and estimated cost of production, the mapping facilities of all departments engaged in the preparation of maps and any duplication of mapping by state departments. All state agencies making and using maps shall cooperate in furnishing the necessary information covering all mapping procedure. These assembled data may be used by the department for all state mapping or map-making.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

8017.

The department shall collect information relative to maps and surveys of the State of California or parts thereof and provide a public information service for public and private persons and agencies relative to maps and surveys of the State. Such information service shall be maintained at Sacramento and may be maintained at Los Angeles and San Francisco.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

8018.

The Department of Water Resources may reproduce copies of maps and survey data of the state which are not otherwise available to the general public. Such copies may be sold and distributed at a price determined by the Department of Water Resources, with the approval of the Department of Finance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1221.)
-------------------------------------------

8019.

The department shall prepare and distribute to public officials, uniform specifications and regulations for aerial photographic mapping procedure and for the preparation of planimetric or topographic maps by photogrammetric methods.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

8020.

On the requests of the state departments the Department of Water Resources shall prepare specifications for the making of maps of the various types suited to the uses required by the departments or the public.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

8022.

No part of any money appropriated or otherwise made available to carry out the provisions of this article shall be expended for the original production of maps unless and until an equal or greater amount of money shall have been made available (by a political subdivision, public district, municipality, county or public agency, including agencies of local and Federal Government but excluding agencies which are a part of the Executive Department of the State Government) for expenditure by the department for work of map production to the end that any sums expended from money appropriated or otherwise made available to carry out the provisions of this article shall be matched by like or greater amounts from sources other than the State Treasury or funds of any agency which is a part of the Executive Department of the State Government; provided, that when the United States or any agency thereof matches funds it shall not be required that funds to be provided from federal sources shall be paid into the State Treasury. However, any work of production of maps which conforms to the general program and prescribed standards thereof, hereafter performed by political subdivisions of the State, may, with the approval of the department be considered as a contribution of moneys to the amount of the cost thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------

8023.

All money received for matching purposes shall be deposited in the Water Resources Revolving Fund and shall be expendable for paying expenses incurred pursuant to an agreement hereunder.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 1581.)
-------------------------------------------

8024.

All money received from the sale of maps or reports and data related thereto shall be deposited in the General Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 1581.)
-------------------------------------------

8025.

The Department of Water Resources shall keep a record of all expenditures chargeable against each portion of the Water Resources Revolving Fund derived from matching moneys and any unused balance in any such portion of the fund shall on approval by the Department of Finance be withdrawn therefrom and paid out or refunded as provided in the agreement relating to such matching moneys.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1957, Ch. 1932.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 11. Exemption From Condemnation [8030. - 8030.]

8030.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all 16th and 36th sections, both surveyed and unsurveyed, owned by the state or the United States, which are now or may hereafter be included within the exterior boundaries of a national reservation, a reserve, or lands withdrawn from public entry, are exempt from taking by eminent domain.

(History: Added by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1240.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Sale of University Lands [8101. - 8106.]

8101.

The Regents of the University of California may order the selection of the 150,000 acres of land granted to the State for the use of an agricultural college, and dispose of the land at the price and in the manner fixed by them.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 609.)
-------------------------------------------

8102.

The land agent of the university, as the agent of the State, shall select the lands according to the instructions of the board, and issue certificates of purchase and patents to purchasers who comply with the conditions fixed by the board. The Regents shall invest all moneys accruing from the sale of lands as they may deem best, subject to the conditions of the act of Congress granting such lands.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 609.)
-------------------------------------------

8103.

All moneys, securities, or other properties arising from the sale of the 72 sections granted to the State for a seminary of learning, and from the sale of the 10 sections granted to the State for the erection of public buildings, shall be paid out of the State Treasury on the order of The Regents of the University.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 759.)
-------------------------------------------

8104.

All persons who have purchased any portion of either of the grants mentioned in Section 8103, and who have not paid in full therefor, shall be included in the delinquent-list, and the district attorney shall proceed against such delinquents as provided in Sections 7902 and 7903, and the provisions of Sections 7903 to 7912, inclusive, are made applicable to such proceedings. If such lands revert to the State, they pass under the control of and may be sold by The Board of Regents of the University.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 609.)
-------------------------------------------

8105.

Whenever any resident of this state desires to purchase any part of the 150,000 acres of land granted to the state for the use of an agricultural college, the resident shall make an affidavit before any officer authorized to administer oaths that the resident is a citizen of the United States or, if not a citizen, that the resident has filed an intention of becoming a citizen, a resident of the state, of lawful age; that the resident desires to purchase land, giving a description thereof by legal subdivisions; that there are no improvements of any kind on the land other than those of the applicant, or if there are improvements other than the applicant’s, the applicant shall state that the improvements are the property of (giving
 the other person’s name), and have been upon the land for three months or over, and that the township has been sectionized and the plats of survey filed in the land office of the district in which the land is located, for three months or over. The application shall be forwarded to the land agent of the university.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 296, Sec. 58.   (AB 1096)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

8106.

When a contest arises between two or more persons concerning the right of such persons to purchase any portion of the land granted to the State for the use of an agricultural college, if either party demands a trial in the courts of the State, the land agent of the university, as the agent of the State, shall make an order, referring the contest to the superior court of the county in which the land involved is situated, and shall enter the order in the proper record book of his office. The party making such demand shall prosecute his contest to judgment within six months from the date of the demand, unless for cause satisfactory to the court. Either party may bring an action in the superior court of the county in which the land in question is situated, to determine the conflict. The proffer of a certified copy of the entry, made by the agent, shall give the superior court full and complete jurisdiction to hear and determine the conflict. Upon the filing, with the agent, of a copy of the final judgment of the court, he shall issue the certificate of purchase, or other evidence of title, in accordance with the final judgment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 609.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 4. FEDERAL LANDS [8301. - 8558.]



  CHAPTER 1. Sites for Aids to Navigation [8301. - 8301.]

8301.

The commission, on application therefor by a duly authorized agent, may convey to the United States a tract of land that does not exceed 10 acres, belonging to the state and covered by navigable waters, for the site of a lighthouse, beacon, or other aid to navigation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 521, Sec. 57.   (SB 809)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Conveyances by Counties for National Park Purposes [8401. - 8403.]

8401.

The boards of supervisors of the several counties may grant, transfer and convey, without consideration, any real property or interest therein now owned or hereafter acquired by any county, to the United States to be used for National park purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 609.)
-------------------------------------------

8402.

Any county may exercise the right of eminent domain to acquire any property necessary or convenient for carrying out the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 1240.)
-------------------------------------------

8403.

The boards of supervisors of the several counties may do and perform all acts that may be necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 609.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Grazing Lands [8501. - 8558.]



  ARTICLE 1. Regulating Grazing on Federal Lands [8501. - 8508.]

8501.

As used in this article, “person” includes individuals, companies, partnerships and associations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 609.)
-------------------------------------------

8502.

It is unlawful to graze livestock on any part of the unreserved and unappropriated public lands of the United States in this State when such grazing will or does prevent, restrict or interfere with the customary use of such land for grazing livestock by any person who, by himself or his grantors or predecessors, has become established, either exclusively or in common with others, in the grazing use of such lands under and in accordance with the customs of the graziers of the region involved. This article shall not prohibit the grazing on any part of such public lands of livestock owned, kept or used for work or milking purposes by any ranch owner or bona fide settler, for his domestic use, as distinguished from commercial use, nor prohibit the grazing on such public lands of any livestock necessary for and used in connection with any mining or construction work or other lawful work of similar character.
